Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.010

Election—Term of office.

A superintendent of public instruction shall be elected by the qualified electors of the state, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the year in which state officers are elected, and shall hold his or her office for the term of four years, and until his or her successor is elected and qualified.

[ 1990 c 33 s 250; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.03.010. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 231 s 1; RRS s 4521; prior: 1897 c 118 s 20; 1891 c 127 s 1; 1890 p 348 s 3; Code 1881 s 3154; 1873 p 419 s 1; 1861 p 55 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.03.010, 28.03.010, 43.11.010.]